Illinois, session 104th, HB4507.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The sum of $25,000,000, or so much of that sum 5as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 6Fund to the Secure Elections Infrastructure Fund for the 7purpose of making security and accessibility upgrades in 8specified voting districts in accordance with Section 1A-70 of 9the Election Code. 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 112026.